Vermont statutes. Title 14 Decedents’ Estates and Fiduciary Relations
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 1611.
Court may order personal and real estate sold.

The Probate Division of the Superior Court may order the sale of all or part of the personal or real estate of the estate when it appears necessary or beneficial for the administration of the estate.

HISTORY:

Amended

1985, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 74;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011;

2017, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 9.

§§ 1612,
1613.
Repealed. 2017, No. 195 (Adj. Sess.), § 9.

§ 1614.
Interested persons may prevent sale; bond.

A license to sell real estate shall not be granted if any interested person gives a bond in such sum and with such sureties as the Probate Division of the Superior Court directs, conditioned to pay the debts and expenses of administration within such time as the court directs. The bond shall be for the security and may be prosecuted for the benefit of the creditors as well as of the executor or administrator.

HISTORY:

Amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011;

2017, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 9.

§§ 1615,
1616.
Repealed. 2017, No. 195 (Adj. Sess.), § 9.